Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIX Provisional Remedies, Enforcement of Judgments, and Exemptions
CHAPTER 426 Enforcement of Judgments
426.480.
Agreement to waive right to replevy.

An agreement to waive the right to replevy, or any other legal agreement in relation to any judgment, if entered on the record among the orders of court, shall be specifically enforced. The proper endorsement shall be made on the execution by the clerk or judge.

History.

1670: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 432, effective January 2, 1978.

426.490.
Sale bond — Where no replevin and sale made on three months’ time — Form.

If the right to replevy exists and is not exercised, sales under execution shall be on a credit of three (3) months, upon the purchaser giving bond with good surety to the plaintiff in execution for the payment of the sale money, bearing interest from date.

The bond shall be in substance as follows: “We, A B, principal, and C D, surety, do bind ourselves to pay to E F, within three (3) months from the date hereof, the sum of $ _________ , with interest thereon from this date, being the purchase money for (here set out the several items of the property so purchased, with the price of each) which was this day sold by G H, sheriff (or constable and so forth, as the case may be), of _________ County, in satisfaction of an execution which issued from the office of the clerk of the _________ court, on the _________ day of _________ , in favor of E F against M O, for the sum of $ _________ , debt of damages, with interest and costs. Given under our hands this _________ day of _________ , 19 _________ .”

History.

1674: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 432, effective January 2, 1978.

426.500.
Surplus proceeds of sale — Disposition.

If the property sold on credit sells for more than necessary to satisfy the execution, costs and commission, the officer making the sale shall take a bond payable to the defendant, the owner of the property, but otherwise similar to and having like force and effect as that provided for in KRS

426.490

, for the excess.

If the property is sold for cash, any excess after satisfying the execution, charges and commissions shall be paid over by the officer to the defendant whose property is sold.

History.

1675.

426.510.
Motions authorized by KRS 426.010 to 426.500 or 426.990 — Limitation.

Any motion authorized by KRS

426.010

to

426.500

or

426.990

shall be commenced within two (2) years after the cause of the motion accrues.

History.

1719.

426.520.
Appraisal of real property before judicial sale.

Before any real property is to be sold under an order or judgment of a court, other than an execution, the commissioner or other officer selling the property shall have it appraised, under oath, by two (2) disinterested, intelligent housekeepers of the county, who may be sworn by the officer. If they disagree, the officer shall act as umpire. If only a part of a tract of land is sold, the part sold shall, after the sale, be revalued in like manner.

The appraisal made shall be in writing, signed by the persons making it, and returned by the commissioner or officer to the court which made the order or rendered the judgment for the sale of the property. Prior to the sale, the appraisal shall be filed among the papers of the cause in which the judgment was rendered or the order made, and entered on the records of the court.

History.

2362, 2363; 2012, ch. 39, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

426.522.
Public, judicial sale of real or personal property — When conducted by licensed auctioneer.

If real or personal property is sold at public sale under any order or decree of any court in this state, then the court under whose jurisdiction the sale is to be made may secure the services of an auctioneer licensed in this state to conduct the public sale, fix the auctioneer’s fee, and order the fee to be paid out of the proceeds of the sale. The fee:

When the sale is the result of a foreclosure process initiated upon the request of a creditor or mortgage holder:

Shall not exceed six percent (6%) of the sale price on sales of real property; and

Shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the sale price on sales of personal property;

In the instance of any other court-ordered or -decreed sale of real or personal property, the fee paid the auctioneer shall be agreed upon between the auctioneer and the person making the request; and

Shall not include the fees and expenses provided for by rule of the Supreme Court under KRS 31A.010(4) that are incurred by the master commissioner for the sale.

Upon the request of the creditor or mortgage holder, when property is ordered to be sold by a court the master commissioner, as described in KRS Chapter 31A, shall employ a licensed auctioneer to handle the sale upon terms and conditions acceptable to the creditor or mortgage holder.

If real property is sold at a public sale conducted by a licensed auctioneer, then the sale shall be conducted on the site of real property to be sold.

If the master commissioner is also a licensed auctioneer, then the master commissioner shall not receive any extra fee for acting as an auctioneer, but shall receive fees in his or her capacity as master commissioner or special commissioner under KRS 31A.010(4).

Nothing contained in this section shall waive any provision of KRS

426.160

,

426.200

, or

426.560

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 36, § 1, effective June 8, 2011; 2021 ch. 151, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

426.525.
Mortgage foreclosure forbidden — Rights of mortgagee after default.

Foreclosure of a mortgage is forbidden; provided, however, that this section shall not preclude a mortgagee after default from taking possession of property subject to the mortgage which has been abandoned by the mortgagor, for the purpose of preserving and maintaining the same, harvesting crops, or letting the same, all to the account of the mortgagor; and any reasonable expenses incident thereto including taxes and insurance shall be added to the principal of the mortgage, and secured by it. For the purpose of this section, property shall be deemed to have been abandoned when the mortgagor has moved from the property and when by the nature of the property in question when further neglect or failure to attend will decrease its value. Any right a mortgagee acquires in a tenant’s interest in crops raised on shares is inferior to any prior existing lien of the landlord on the tenant’s interest. Nothing in this section shall be construed as conflicting with the provisions of KRS

383.110

or

426.205

.

History.

C.C. 375: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; amend. Acts 1972, ch. 90, § 1; 2012, ch. 93, § 2, effective July 12, 2012.

426.530.
Right of redemption — Manner of redeeming — Purchaser to receive writ of possession and deed.

If real property sold in pursuance of a judgment or order of a court, other than an execution, does not bring two-thirds (2/3) of its appraised value, the defendant and his or her representatives may redeem it within six (6) months from the day of sale, by paying the original purchase money and ten percent (10%) per annum interest thereon, and any reasonable costs incurred by the purchaser after the sale for maintenance or repair of the property, including but not limited to utility expenses, insurance, association fees, taxes, and the costs to conform the property to the minimum standards of local nuisance code provisions and other local ordinances as authorized in KRS

65.8801

to

65.8839

.

The defendant shall pay the redemption money to the clerk of the court in which the judgment was rendered or the order of sale was made. Upon payment by the defendant, the master commissioner shall convey the real property to the defendant.

When the right of redemption exists, the purchaser shall receive an immediate writ of possession and a deed containing a lien in favor of the defendant, reflecting the defendant’s right to redeem during the statutory period.

History.

2364: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 216, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2014, ch. 107, § 1, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 86, § 16, effective July 15, 2016.

426.540.
Redemption right may be sold — Rights of purchaser and debtor — Report of sale.

If the proceeds of sale fail to satisfy the judgment, the right of redemption provided for in KRS

426.530

may be sold to satisfy the residue of the judgment. The right of redemption shall also be liable to sale under execution. The land shall be subject to redemption from both purchasers for one (1) year from the first sale. The purchaser of the right of redemption may, before the end of a year from the first sale, pay the prior purchaser his purchase money and interest as provided in KRS

426.530

, and shall then be entitled to the land, subject to the rights of possession and redemption held by the defendant in the execution. A sale made in pursuance of any such judgment or order shall be reported to the court by the commissioner or officer who made the sale, and the report shall state at what sum the property sold was appraised. If the report is not excepted to, the sale may be confirmed, but if the land is redeemed the confirmation shall thereafter be null and void.

History.

2365.

426.550.
Death of party after sale under court order — Revivor not necessary.

If, by the judgment of any court of this state, real property is sold and any party to the action dies after the sale is confirmed, or, if the court orders any conveyance of real property by a commissioner and a party to the proceedings dies before the conveyance is perfected, it shall not be necessary on that account to revive the action, but the sale or conveyance when perfected shall pass title to the same extent as if all the parties were living.

History.

521.

426.551.
Issual of execution after death of plaintiff — Who treated as plaintiff.

The death of a party, after recovering a judgment, shall not prevent the issuing of an execution afterward; but

Upon a judgment recovered by one (1) party, execution issued after his death must be in favor of his representative or successor who is entitled to the property for which the judgment was rendered.

Upon a judgment recovered by several parties, execution issued after the death of one must be in favor of the other.

Upon a judgment recovered by several parties, execution issued after the death of all of them must be in favor of the last survivor’s representative or successor who would have been entitled to the property if the judgment had been recovered by such survivor only.

The clerk shall indorse on the execution the names of the decedent and of such survivor, representative or successor.

An execution issued in favor of a survivor, representative or successor of a decedent shall be subject to the control of the court whence it issued for the protection of any person interested therein.

Upon such execution, the person entitled thereto, according to the indorsement of the clerk, shall be treated by the sheriff as the plaintiff therein.

History.

C.C. 402, 403: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.552.
Affidavit and other documents required before issuance of execution — When bond required.

The clerk, before making the indorsements required by paragraph (d) of subsection (1) of KRS

426.551

, shall require the person claiming right thereto to file an affidavit showing his right. If the affiant state that he is a personal representative or successor of a decedent, the clerk shall also require him to file a copy, properly certified, of his appointment as such by a competent tribunal in the United States; and, unless the appointment was made in Kentucky, the clerk shall also require of him a covenant, with good surety, that he will dispose, according to law, of any property which he may receive upon the execution. If the affiant state that he is a devisee of a decedent, the clerk shall require him to file a copy of the will, certified by a county clerk in this state in which the will or a copy is recorded.

History.

C.C. 404: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1978, ch. 384, § 528, effective June 17, 1978.

426.553.
Execution against surviving defendant.

The death of a defendant shall not prevent the issuing of an execution against a surviving defendant.

History.

C. C. 405: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.554.
Court may quash execution improperly issued.

The court may, after reasonable notice, quash an execution on the ground that the representative or successor of a deceased plaintiff is not properly stated in the indorsement on the execution.

History.

C.C. 406: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 433, effective January 2, 1978.

426.555.
Procedure in case of death of execution defendant.

The death of a defendant after a sale of his property under execution shall not prevent a conveyance of the property. It shall be conveyed in the same manner and with the same effect as if he were living.

The levy of an execution is not discharged by the death of the defendant but is suspended according to the provisions of the next following subsection.

A judgment, or the levy of an execution, may be revived against the personal representative or successor of a defendant after the lapse of six (6) months from the time of the qualification of his first representative and against a real representative after the lapse of twelve (12) months from the time of the death of the defendant. If, however, owing to the perishable nature of the property levied on, or the cost of keeping it, a sale of it would be beneficial, the court may so order; and the proceeds shall be held subject to the order of the court on the rule for a revivor.

The revivor may be made upon a rule in the action, ten (10) days’ notice of which shall be served in the same manner as summons. The motion for revivor shall be docketed and tried as other motions, and the court may cause execution to issue without delay.

History.

C.C. 407: trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 14; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 434, effective January 2, 1978.

426.560.
Newspaper advertisement required in execution and judicial sales.

In addition to the notices now required by statute to be posted, all public sales of any kind of property sold under execution, judgment or decree, shall, unless otherwise agreed upon by the parties, be advertised by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. The advertisement shall state the time, place and terms of sale and describe the property to be sold. The newspaper advertisement shall not be necessary where the appraised value of the property to be sold is less than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

14a-1: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 229.

426.570.
Conveyances to be made by commissioner — Deed of partition.

Unless otherwise specially ordered by the court, the master commissioner of a Circuit Court shall make all conveyances of real property that are authorized by law to be made by a commissioner of the Circuit Court. In the partition of land, there shall be but one (1) deed, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

History.

406.

426.571.
When commissioner may convey real property — Death of party after sale.

Real property may be conveyed by a commissioner appointed by the court:

If by the judgment in an action a party be ordered to convey such property to another.

If such property have been sold under a judgment or order of the court and the sale confirmed.

The death of a party, after a sale, does not prevent a conveyance. It shall be made, and shall have the same effect, as if he were living.

History.

C.C. 394: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.572.
Requisites of commissioner’s deed.

The deed of the commissioner shall refer to the judgment, orders and proceedings, authorizing the conveyance, so that the same may be readily found.

History.

C.C. 395: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.573.
Title passed by deed made pursuant to judgment.

A conveyance made in pursuance of a judgment shall pass to the grantee the title of the parties ordered to convey the land.

History.

C.C. 396: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.574.
Title passed by deed made pursuant to order of sale.

A conveyance made in pursuance of a sale ordered by the court shall pass to the grantee the title of all the parties to the action or proceeding.

History.

C.C. 397: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.575.
Court to examine and approve deed.

A conveyance by a commissioner shall not pass any right, until it has been examined and approved by the court; which approval shall be indorsed on the conveyance, and recorded with it.

History.

C.C. 398: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.576.
Commissioner to sign — Names of parties to be stated.

It shall be necessary for the conveyance to be signed by the commissioner only, without affixing the names of the parties whose title is conveyed; but the names of such parties shall be recited in the conveyance.

History.

C.C. 399: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.577.
Where deed to be recorded.

The conveyance shall be recorded where, by law it should have been recorded, had it been made by the parties whose title is conveyed by it.

History.

C.C. 400: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Place of recording of instruments, KRS

382.110

.

426.580.
Forthcoming bond for personalty levied on — Form — Effect.

The owner of personal property taken in execution may give to the levying officer a bond, with good surety, to have the property forthcoming at the time and place of sale, which shall specify each article of property and its value.

The bond shall be in substance as follows:

Upon the giving of the bond, the officer shall restore the possession of the property taken in execution to the defendant, to remain with him at his own risk and expense until the time stipulated for its delivery.

“We, A B, principal, and C D, surety, do bind ourselves that the property mentioned in the following schedule and valuation, to-wit: , valued at dollars (naming each article and its value) shall be forthcoming at on the day of next, by the hour of twelve o’clock in the day. Witness our hands, .”

Click to view

History.

1671.

426.590.
Failure to deliver property on forthcoming bond — Return of officer — Liability of surety — Execution for balance due.

If the defendant in execution fails to pay or replevy the amount of the execution, and fails to deliver the property specified in the forthcoming bond or other property in its place sufficient to satisfy the execution and all costs and commissions, the officer shall return the execution and bond to the office where it was issued and endorse on the execution the levy, the giving of the bond, the particular property which is not forthcoming and all other facts. The surety on the forthcoming bond shall be liable only for the value of the property specified in the bond which is not forthcoming, with interest thereon from the date of the bond and the accruing costs.

If the property specified in a forthcoming bond is not of value sufficient to satisfy the execution and all costs and commissions, the proper officer may issue another execution and credit it with the value of the property specified in the bond.

History.

1672.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Bond of Purchaser of Property Under Execution, Form 151.13.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Returns of Sheriff on Executions, Form 151.24.

426.600.
Liability of officer for failure to return forthcoming bond.

Any officer taking a forthcoming bond who fails to return it to the proper office for twenty (20) days after the failure to comply on the part of the defendant in execution shall, with his sureties, be liable to the plaintiff for the amount of the execution, costs and commission, and for an additional twenty percent (20%) thereon, to be recovered by action or motion against any one (1) or more of them or their representatives.

History.

1673.

426.610.
Bonds having the effect of a judgment — General provisions for.

Every bond taken on the sale of property under an order of judgment in chancery or on the sale of property under execution, and every replevin and forthcoming bond, shall be signed by the principal and surety, and attested by the person taking the bond, or by someone in his presence. A bond so taken shall be returned to the proper office, with a report of the acts of the person taking it, and, if taken under an execution, the execution shall be returned with the bond. Every such bond shall have the force and effect of a judgment, and if not paid at maturity an execution may issue, which shall be endorsed that no surety of any kind is to be taken.

The officer taking any bond referred to in subsection (1) of this section, and his sureties, or their representatives, shall be jointly and severally liable to the person injured for any damage he may sustain by the officer taking as surety on the bond a person who was not solvent at the time.

If one of several obligors or obligees, in any bond referred to in subsection (1) of this section, dies before the bond is satisfied, execution may issue on the bond in the name of the surviving obligees, against the obligor or the survivor. If all the obligees in such a bond die, their personal representatives may, if the bond is not satisfied at maturity, sue out execution thereon against the obligors or their personal representatives if they are all dead, or, if only part are dead, against the survivor and the personal representatives of the deceased.

If any bond referred to in subsection (1) of this section is quashed, a new execution may issue on the original judgment at the instance of the plaintiff, in the same manner as if the bond had never been given.

History.

1676 to 1680.

426.615.
Execution plaintiff may substitute for officer in action for recovery of property taken under execution or rent attachment.

In an action against a sheriff or other officer for the recovery of property taken under an execution or rent attachment the court may, upon the application of the defendant and of the party in whose favor the execution or rent attachment is issued, permit the latter to be substituted as the defendant, security for the costs being given.

History.

C.C. 32: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976, ch. 91, § 42.

426.620.
Indemnity bond required before levy of execution. [Repealed.]

426.625.
Rights of officer if indemnity bond not given. [Repealed.]

426.630.
Action by claimant or purchaser must be upon indemnity bond. [Repealed.]

426.635.
Disposition of surplus proceeds of sale. [Repealed.]

426.640.
Bond required for suspension of sale of personal property.

The sale of personal property upon which an execution is levied shall be suspended at the instance of any person, other than the defendant in the execution, claiming the property, who shall execute, with one (1) or more sureties sufficient for double its value, a bond to the plaintiff in the execution, to the effect that, if it shall be adjudged that the property or any part of it is subject to the execution, he will pay to the plaintiff the value of the property so subject, and ten percent (10%) thereon, not exceeding the amount due on the execution, and ten percent (10%) thereon.

History.

C.C. 645: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.645.
Property to be appraised for purpose of taking bond.

For the purpose of taking the bond mentioned in KRS

426.640

, the officer shall select three (3) disinterested housekeepers, and administer to them an oath to make a fair appraisement of each article of the property; whose appraisement, in writing, shall be recited in the bond.

History.

C.C. 646: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.650.
Return of indemnity bond and appraisement to court. [Repealed.]

426.655.
Trial of motion for judgment on bond — Judgment — Execution.

The party to whom the bond is executed may move the court to which it is returned for a judgment thereon against all or any of the obligors or their representatives, having given to them ten days’ notice of the motion. The court shall direct a jury to be impaneled, and may cause such issues to be tried as it may prescribe, and direct which party shall be considered plaintiff in the issues. If the property, or any part of it, be found subject to the execution, judgment shall be rendered in favor of the plaintiff therein for the value of the property so subject and ten percent thereon, not exceeding the amount due on the execution and ten percent thereon. An execution may be issued upon the judgment forthwith, on which the same indorsement shall be made as on the execution in virtue of which the property had been seized.

History.

C.C. 648: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.660.
Trial of objection to appraisement.

Upon the trial of the motion, either party may object that the property was not fairly appraised; and, thereupon, the jury trying the facts shall hear evidence respecting, and find, the value of the property.

History.

C.C. 649: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Appraisement of Personal Property Before Taking Claimant’s Bond, Form 151.18.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Notice of a Motion Against Obligors in a Claimant’s Bond, Given to Suspend a Sale Under an Execution, Form 151.20.

426.665.
Bond not to discharge levy — Motion to discharge.

The giving of the bond mentioned in KRS

426.640

shall not discharge the levy of the execution upon the property claimed. But the officer may leave it, subject to the lien of the levy, with the person in whose possession it was found, pending the proceeding on the bond; and may, in the meantime, proceed with the execution against any other property of the defendant. The obligor in such bond may, however, on ten (10) days’ notice to the plaintiff in the execution, move the court to which the bond is returned to discharge the same and release the levy under the execution. The provisions of KRS

426.655

and

426.660

shall, so far as applicable, govern the proceedings upon such motion.

History.

C.C. 650: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.670.
Provisions governing executions from quarterly or justices’ courts. [Repealed.]

426.675.
Certain jury trials of right of property abolished.

Trials by juries summoned by sheriffs or other officers, of the right of property taken by them under execution or rent attachment, are abolished.

History.

C.C. 659: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976, ch. 91, § 44.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Rent, proceedings for recovery of, KRS

383.010

to

383.090

.

426.680.
Procedure for levy of execution on jointly owned property.

If an officer levy an execution upon personal property held by the execution debtor jointly with another person:

The officer shall not deprive such person, without his consent in writing, of the possession of the property, except for the purpose of having it inventoried and appraised, which he shall cause to be done pursuant to the provisions of KRS

426.645

;

The officer shall return the inventory and appraisement, with the execution, to the office from which it issued; and shall state in his return the facts connected with the levy, and the claim of the joint owner;

The execution creditor shall have a lien upon the property levied on, such as is given by law to an execution in the hands of an officer; and upon the aforesaid return, the creditor may enforce said lien by an action in equity;

If such creditor, at the commencement of his action or afterward, shall file an affidavit that he verily believes the property levied upon will be removed from the county or sold or otherwise disposed of with intent fraudulently to defeat his lien, the court, or the District Court if no Circuit Judge is available, may make an order directing the officer to possess himself of the property so levied upon, unless bond, with approved security, shall be executed to the plaintiff in the execution, binding the obligors in said bond to have the same forthcoming in obedience to any order or judgment of the court in the action; which bond shall be taken by the officer and returned by him to the court in which the action is pending.

History.

C.C. 660: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 436, effective January 2, 1978.

426.685.
Provisions governing sales by court order of indivisible real property.

Before ordering a sale of real property for the payment of debt, the court must be satisfied by the pleadings, by an agreement of the parties, by affidavits filed, or by a report of a commissioner or commissioners, whether or not the property can be divided without materially impairing its value, and may cause it to be divided, with suitable avenues, streets, lanes or alleys, or without any of them.

If it be necessary to sell, for the payment of debt, a parcel of real property which can not be divided without materially impairing its value, the officer shall sell the whole of it, though it bring more than the sum to be raised, and the court shall make proper orders for the distribution of the proceeds.

History.

C.C. 694(1), (2): amend. Acts 1916, ch. 105; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

426.690.
Procedure in action to enforce lien where other liens exist against real property.

The plaintiff in an action to enforce a lien on real property shall state in his petition the liens, if any, which are held thereon by others, and make the holders defendants; and no sale of the property shall be ordered by the court prejudicial to the rights of the holders of any of the liens, and when it appears from the petition or otherwise, that several debts are secured by one (1) lien, or by liens of equal rank, and they are all due at the commencement of the action, or become so before judgment, the court shall order the sale for the pro rata satisfaction of all of them, but if, in such case, the debts be owned by different persons and be not all due, the court shall not order a sale of the property until they all mature. If all such liens be held by the same party, the court may order a sale of enough of the property to pay the debts then due, unless it appear that it is not susceptible of advantageous division, or that, for some other reason, the sale would cause a sacrifice thereof, or seriously prejudice the interests of the defendants, but the holder of a prior lien may enforce the same when the debt thereby secured is due, notwithstanding the existence of inferior liens, whether the debts secured thereby are due or not; and the holder of an inferior lien, when the debt thereby secured is due, may enforce the same by a sale of land subject to a prior lien or liens thereon, where the debt or debts secured thereby are not yet due. Provided, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to any liens now of record.

History.

C.C. 694(3): amend. Acts 1916, ch. 105; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1.

426.695.
Sale of indivisible personal property — Payment of excess — Proceeds.

If it be necessary to sell, for payment of debt, one or more parcels of personal property which, in the opinion of the officer making the sale, can not be divided without materially impairing the value thereof, he shall sell the whole property, though it bring more than the sum to be raised; but he shall have no commission on the excess. The excess shall be paid to the defendant, or the bond therefor shall be payable to him.

History.

C.C. 695: trans Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.700.
Time, place and terms of sale — Notice.

Every sale made under an order of court must be public, either for cash or upon reasonable credits to be fixed by the court; and shall be made after such notice of the time, place and terms of sale as the order may direct; and, unless the order direct otherwise, shall be made at the door of the courthouse of the county in which the property, or the greater part thereof, may be situated; and the notice of sale must state for what sum of money it is to be made.

History.

C.C. 696: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; amend. Acts 1970, ch. 178, § 1.

426.705.
Bond required of purchaser.

The purchaser of property sold under an order of court shall give bond for the price, with good surety, approved by the officer making the sale, payable to him or to the person entitled to receive the money, as the court may direct; or, if the court make no order on the subject, they shall be made payable to the officer.

They shall bear interest from date at the rate the judgment bears.

They shall have the force of judgments; and on executions issued upon them no replevy shall be allowed, and sales shall be for cash.

History.

C.C. 697: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.710.
Purchaser of personal property entitled to it.

The purchaser of personal property sold under an order of court shall be entitled to it, upon complying with the terms of sale.

History.

C.C. 698: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.715.
Lien on realty as security for purchase money — Release.

A lien shall exist on real property sold under an order of court, as security for the purchase money; and, upon payment thereof the clerk shall release the lien on the margin of the record of the deed in the office of the county clerk, or at the option of the county clerk, in a marginal entry record kept for the same purpose. Each entry in the marginal entry record shall be linked to its respective referenced instrument in the indexing system for the referenced instrument.

History.

C.C. 699: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953; 1978, ch. 384, § 529, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 323, § 5, effective July 15, 1982.

426.720.
Final judgment to act as lien on realty — Judgment creditor’s notice requirements — Methods of service.

A final judgment for the recovery of money or costs in the courts of record in this Commonwealth, whether state or federal, shall act as a lien upon all real estate in which the judgment debtor has any ownership interest, in any county in which the following first shall be done:

The judgment creditor or his counsel shall file with the county clerk of any county a notice of judgment lien containing the court of record entering the judgment, the civil action number of the suit in which the judgment was entered, and the amount of the judgment, including principal, interest rate, court costs, and any attorney fees;

The county clerk shall enter the notice in the lis pendens records in that office, and shall so note the entry upon the original of the notice;

The judgment creditor or his counsel shall send to the last known address of the judgment debtor or the judgment debtor’s attorney of record, by regular first class mail, postage prepaid, or shall deliver to the debtor personally, a copy of the notice of judgment lien, which notice shall include the text of KRS

427.060

and also the following notice, or language substantially similar:

“Notice to Judgment Debtor. You may be entitled to an exemption under KRS

427.060

, reprinted below. If you believe you are entitled to assert an exemption, seek legal advice.”; and

The judgment creditor or his counsel shall certify on the notice of judgment lien that a copy thereof has been mailed to the judgment debtor in compliance with paragraph (c) of this subsection.

In any action involving real property which is subject to a judgment lien, service may be had upon the judgment creditor by serving the judgment creditor or the judgment creditor’s attorney as shown in the notice of judgment lien.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 318, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 2013, ch. 58, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/2013). Under the authority of KRS 7.136(1), the Reviser of Statutes has modified the internal numbering of this statute from the way it appeared in 2013 Ky. Acts ch. 58, sec. 1. An internal reference was also changed to correspond to the new numbering system, but the words in the text were not changed.